California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Suit for Refund [19381. - 19394.]

19381.

No injunction or writ of mandate or other legal or equitable process shall issue in any suit, action, or proceeding in any court against this state or against any officer of this state to prevent or enjoin the assessment or collection of any tax under this part; provided, however, that any individual after protesting a notice or notices of deficiency assessment issued because of his or her alleged residence in this state and after appealing from the action of the Franchise Tax Board to the State Board of Equalization, may within 60
 days after the action of the State Board of Equalization becomes final commence an action, on the grounds set forth in his or her protest, in the Superior Court of the County of Sacramento, in the County of Los Angeles or in the City and County of San Francisco against the Franchise Tax Board to determine the fact of his or her residence in this state during the year or years set forth in the notice or notices of deficiency assessment. No tax based solely upon the residence of such an individual shall be collected from that individual until 60 days after the action of the State Board of Equalization becomes final and, if he or she commences an action pursuant to this section, during the pendency of the action, other than by way of or under the jeopardy assessment provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19382.

Except as provided in Section 19385, after payment of the tax and denial by the Franchise Tax Board of a claim for refund, any taxpayer claiming that the tax computed and assessed is void in whole or in part may bring an action, upon the grounds set forth in that claim for refund, against the Franchise Tax Board for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19383.

The credit of an overpayment of any tax in satisfaction of any tax liability shall, for the purpose of any suit for refund of the tax liability so satisfied, be deemed to be a payment in respect of the tax liability at the time the credit is allowed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19384.

The action provided by Section 19382 shall be filed within four years from the last date prescribed for filing the return or within one year from the date the tax was paid, or within 90 days after (a) notice of action by the Franchise Tax Board upon any claim for refund, or (b) the determination (including the issuance of a decision, opinion, or dismissal) by the State Board of Equalization on an appeal from the action of the Franchise Tax Board on a claim for refund becomes final pursuant to Section 19334, whichever period expires the
 later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 605, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19385.

If the Franchise Tax Board fails to mail notice of action on any refund claim within six months after the claim was filed, the taxpayer may, prior to mailing of notice of action on the refund claim, consider the claim disallowed and bring an action against the Franchise Tax Board on the grounds set forth in the claim for the recovery of the whole or any part of the amount claimed as an overpayment. For substitution of the 120-day period for the six-month period contained in this section in a Title 11 case, see Section 505(a)(2) of
 Title 11 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19387.

Whenever an action is commenced against the Franchise Tax Board under this article, a copy of the complaint and the summons shall be served upon the Franchise Tax Board or the executive officer. A second copy of the complaint and the summons shall be furnished to the Franchise Tax Board, but this requirement is not jurisdictional.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19388.

Any action against the Franchise Tax Board under this article shall be commenced and tried in any city or city and county in which the Attorney General maintains an office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19389.

The Attorney General or the counsel for the Franchise Tax Board of California shall defend the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19390.

Failure to begin an action within the time specified in this article shall be a bar against the recovery of taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19391.

In any judgment of any court rendered for any overpayment, interest shall be allowed at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521 upon the amount of the overpayment, from the date of the payment or collection thereof to the date of allowance of credit on account of the judgment or to a date preceding the date of the refund warrant by not more than 30 days, the date to be determined by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19392.

If judgment is rendered against the Franchise Tax Board, the amount thereof shall first be credited against any taxes and interest due from the taxpayer and the remainder refunded to the taxpayer or his or her trust or estate, or in the case of a corporation, its successor through reorganization, merger, or consolidation, or its stockholders upon dissolution, by the Treasurer on warrants drawn by the Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19393.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), for the purposes of the tax imposed under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 23101) of Part 11, if any deduction, credit, or exclusion provided for in Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) is finally adjudged discriminatory against a national banking association contrary to Section 548 of Title 12 of the United States Code, or is for any reason finally adjudged invalid or discriminatory under the California Constitution, or the laws or the Constitution of the United States, the tax of the favored taxpayer shall be recomputed by the Franchise Tax Board for the taxable year in question, as of the time of allowance of the deduction, credit, or exclusion, by disallowing the deduction, credit, or exclusion, and any difference between the amount of the tax as recomputed and the amount of the tax as originally computed shall be subject to the provisions hereof relating to original computations.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a taxpayer for the invalidation of any provision of Section 17053.98, 17053.99, or 23698 amended or added by the act that added
 this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 114, Sec. 4.   (SB 144)   Effective July 21, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

19394.

If the fee provided under Section 17942 is finally adjudged to be discriminatory or unfairly apportioned under the California Constitution, or the laws or the Constitution of the United States, the fee of a disfavored taxpayer that files, or has filed, a timely claim for refund within the period allowed by this part asserting discrimination or unfair apportionment shall be recomputed by the Franchise Tax Board for the taxable year in question, as of the time of allowance of the recomputation, only to the extent necessary to remedy the discrimination or unfair
 apportionment that is not otherwise relieved by Section 19393 and the amount of the fee, as originally computed, shall be subject to the provisions hereof relating to original computations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 381, Sec. 3.   Effective October 10, 2007.   Applicable as prescribed in Sec. 4 of Ch. 381.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recovery of Erroneous Refunds [19411. - 19413.]

19411.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may recover any refund or credit or any portion thereof that is erroneously made or allowed to the taxpayer or any third party, including where the taxpayer or a related party caused, in any way, that erroneous refund, together with interest at the adjusted annual rate established pursuant to Section 19521, in an action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction in the County of Sacramento in the name of the people of the State of California within whichever of the following periods expires the later:

(1) Two years after the refund or credit was made.

(2) During the period within which the Franchise Tax Board may mail a notice of proposed deficiency assessment.

(b) Abatement of interest under this section is governed by subdivision (c) of Section 19104.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 234, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19412.

The action shall be tried in the County of Sacramento unless the court with the consent of the prosecutor orders a change of place of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19413.

The Attorney General or the counsel for the Franchise Tax Board shall prosecute the action, and the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to service of summons, pleadings, proofs, trials, and appeals are applicable to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Cancellations [19431. - 19431.]

19431.

If a tax has been illegally levied against a taxpayer, the Franchise Tax Board shall set forth on its records the reasons therefor and thereafter shall authorize the cancellation of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Closing Agreements [19441. - 19443.]

19441.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board or any person authorized in writing by the Franchise Tax Board is authorized to enter into an agreement in writing with any person (or the person or estate for whom that person acts) in respect of any tax, interest, penalty, or addition to tax levied under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part for any taxable period.

(b) If the agreement is approved by the Franchise Tax Board, itself,
 within the time as may be stated in the agreement, or later agreed to, the agreement shall be final and conclusive, and except upon a showing of fraud or malfeasance, or misrepresentation of a material fact:

(1) The case shall not be reopened as to the matters agreed upon or the agreement modified, by any officer, employee, or agent of the state, and

(2) In any suit, action, or proceeding, the agreement, or any determination, assessment, collection, payment, abatement, refund, or credit made in accordance therewith, shall not be annulled, modified, set aside, or disregarded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 726, Sec. 38.   Effective September 22, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

19442.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Franchise Tax Board, its staff, and the Attorney General pursue settlements as authorized under this section with respect to civil tax matters in dispute that are the subject of protests, appeals, or refund claims, consistent with a reasonable
 evaluation of the costs and risks associated with litigation of these matters.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) and subject to paragraph (2), the executive officer or chief counsel, if authorized by the executive officer, of the Franchise Tax Board may recommend to the Franchise Tax Board, itself, a settlement of any civil tax matter in dispute.

(2) No recommendation of settlement shall be submitted to the Franchise Tax Board, itself, unless and until that recommendation has been submitted by the executive officer or chief counsel to the Attorney General. Within 30 days of receiving that recommendation, the Attorney General shall review the recommendation and advise in writing the executive officer or chief counsel of the Franchise Tax Board of his or her conclusions as to whether the recommendation is reasonable from an overall perspective. The
 executive officer or chief counsel shall, with each recommendation of settlement submitted to the Franchise Tax Board, itself, also submit the Attorney General’s written conclusions obtained pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) (A) A settlement of any civil tax matter in dispute involving a reduction of tax or penalties in settlement, the total of which reduction of tax and penalties in settlement does not exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500), may be approved by the executive officer and chief counsel, jointly. The executive officer shall notify the Franchise Tax Board, itself, of any settlement approved pursuant to this paragraph.

(B) On January 1 of each calendar year beginning on or after January 1, 2004, the Franchise Tax Board shall increase the amount specified in subparagraph (A) to the amount computed under this subparagraph. That adjustment
 shall be made as follows:

(i) The Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit annually to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index, as modified for rental equivalent homeownership for all items, from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year.

(ii) The Franchise Tax Board shall then:

(I) Compute the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index from the later of June 2003 or June of the calendar year prior to the last increase in the amount specified in subparagraph (A).

(II) Compute the inflation adjustment factor by adding 100 percent to the percentage change so computed, and converting the resulting percentage to
 the decimal equivalent.

(III) Multiply the amount specified in subparagraph (A) for the immediately preceding calendar year, as adjusted under this paragraph, by the inflation adjustment factor determined in subclause (II), and round off the resulting product to the nearest one hundred dollars ($100).

(c) Whenever a reduction of tax or penalties or total tax and penalties in settlement in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved pursuant to this section, there shall be placed on file in the office of the executive officer of the Franchise Tax Board a public record with respect to that settlement. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name or names of the taxpayers who are parties to the settlement.

(2) The
 total amount in dispute.

(3) The amount agreed to pursuant to the settlement.

(4) A summary of the reasons why the settlement is in the best interests of the State of California.

(5) For any settlement approved by the Franchise Tax Board, itself, the Attorney General’s conclusion as to whether the recommendation of settlement was reasonable from an overall perspective.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or the national defense.

(d) The members of the Franchise Tax Board shall not participate in the settlement of tax
 matters pursuant to this section, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(e) (1) Any recommendation for settlement shall be approved or disapproved by the Franchise Tax Board, itself, within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation. Any recommendation for settlement that is not either approved or disapproved by the Franchise Tax Board, itself, within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved. Upon approval of a recommendation for settlement, the matter shall be referred back to the executive officer or chief counsel in accordance with the decision of the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) Disapproval of a recommendation for settlement shall be made only by a majority vote of the Franchise Tax Board. Where the Franchise Tax Board disapproves a recommendation for settlement, the matter shall be remanded to Franchise Tax Board staff
 for further negotiation, and may be resubmitted to the Franchise Tax Board, in the same manner and subject to the same requirements as the initial submission, at the discretion of the executive officer or chief counsel.

(f) (1) All settlements entered into pursuant to this section shall be final and nonappealable, except upon a showing of fraud or misrepresentation with respect to a material fact.

(2) A settlement may include matters that may otherwise be included in an agreement under Section 19441.

(3) Settlements pursuant to this section do not preclude assessments or refunds under Section 19059, 19060, or 19311 (relating to application of federal adjustments).

(g) (1) Any proceedings undertaken by the
 Franchise Tax Board itself pursuant to a settlement as described in this section shall be conducted in a closed session or sessions.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any settlement entered into pursuant to this section shall constitute confidential tax information for purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 19542) of Chapter 7.

(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no evidence of an offer of settlement made during settlement negotiations is admissible in any adjudicative proceeding or civil action, including, without limitation, any appeal to the board, whether as affirmative evidence, by way of impeachment, or for any other purpose, and no evidence of conduct or statements related to the settlement negotiations is admissible to prove liability for any tax, penalty, fee, or interest, except to the extent provided for in Section 1152 of the Evidence
 Code.

(4) A settlement approved by the Franchise Tax Board, itself, shall be final and conclusive, to the same extent as an agreement under Section 19441 approved by the Franchise Tax Board, itself.

(h) This section shall apply only to civil tax matters in dispute existing on or after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(i) The Legislature finds that it is essential for fiscal purposes that the settlement program authorized by this section be expeditiously implemented. Accordingly, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board in implementing and administering the settlement program authorized by this section.

(j) The amendments made to this section by Section 1 of Chapter 258 of the Statutes of 2002 shall apply to any settlements approved on or after January 1, 2003.

(k) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any settlement negotiations entered into on or after the date of enactment, without regard to a taxable year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 309, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19443.

(a) (1) The Executive Officer and Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board, jointly, or their delegates, may compromise any final tax liability in which the reduction of tax is seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) or less.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the Franchise Tax Board, upon recommendation
 by its executive officer and chief counsel, jointly, may compromise a final tax liability involving a reduction in tax in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500). Any recommendation for approval of an offer in compromise that is not either approved or disapproved by the Franchise Tax Board, itself, within 45 days of the submission of the recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board, itself, may by resolution delegate to the executive officer and the chief counsel, jointly, the authority to compromise a final tax liability in which the reduction of tax is in excess of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) but less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, “a final tax liability” means any final tax liability arising under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) or
 related interest, additions to tax, penalties, or other amounts assessed under this part.

(c) For an amount to be compromised under this section, the following conditions shall exist:

(1) The taxpayer shall establish that the:

(A) Amount offered in payment is the most that can be expected to be paid or collected from the taxpayer’s present assets or income, and

(B) Taxpayer does not have reasonable prospects of acquiring increased income or assets that would enable the taxpayer to satisfy a greater amount of the liability than the amount offered, within a reasonable period of time.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall have determined that acceptance of the compromise is in the best interest
 of the state.

(d) A determination by the Franchise Tax Board that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final tax liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(e) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the Franchise Tax Board shall notify the taxpayer in writing.

(f) In the case of a joint and several liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable spouse shall not relieve the other spouse from paying the entire liability. However, the amount of the liability shall be reduced by the amount of the accepted offer.

(g) Whenever a compromise of tax or
 penalties or total tax and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the Executive Officer of the Franchise Tax Board a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the taxpayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid tax, and related penalties, additions to tax, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secret, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or
 organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or the national defense. No list shall be prepared and no releases distributed by the Franchise Tax Board in connection with these statements.

(h) Any compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished (without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable), and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The Franchise Tax Board determines that any person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the Franchise Tax Board any property belonging to the estate of any taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified any book, document, or record or made any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(2) The taxpayer fails to either:

(A) Comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(B) File subsequent required returns and pay subsequent final tax liabilities within 20 days after the Franchise Tax Board issues notice and demand to the person stating that the continued failure to file or pay the tax may result in rescission of the compromise.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if the Franchise Tax Board determines that any portion of an application for an offer in compromise or
 installment agreement submitted under this section or Section 19008 meets the requirements of clause (i) or (ii) of Section 6702(b)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by Section 19179, then the Franchise Tax Board may treat that portion as if it were never submitted and that portion shall not be subject to any further administrative or judicial review.

(j) This section shall become operative on the effective date of Chapter 931 of the Statutes of 1999 without regard to the taxable year at issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 53.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Administration of Tax [19501. - 19592.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers and Duties of Franchise Tax Board [19501. - 19533.]

19501.

The Franchise Tax Board shall administer and enforce Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), and this part. For this purpose, it may divide the state into a reasonable number of districts, in each of which a branch office or offices may be maintained during all or part of the time as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19502.

In the establishment of the districts and offices, the Franchise Tax Board shall give due consideration to the matter of economy of administration and service to the taxpayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19503.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall prescribe all rules and regulations necessary for the enforcement of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), and this part and may prescribe the extent to which any ruling (including any judicial decision or any administrative determination other than by regulation) shall be applied without retroactive effect.

(b) (1) Except as
 otherwise provided in this subdivision, no regulation relating to Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part shall apply to any taxable year ending before the date on which any notice substantially describing the expected contents of any regulation is issued to the public.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to either of the following:

(A) Regulations issued within 24 months of the date of the enactment of the statutory provision to which the regulation relates.

(B) Regulations issued within 24 months of the date that temporary or final federal regulations with respect to statutory provisions to which California conforms are filed with the Federal Register.

(3) The Franchise Tax Board may provide that any regulation may take effect or apply retroactively to prevent abuse.

(4) The Franchise Tax Board may provide that any regulation may apply retroactively to correct a procedural defect in the issuance of any prior regulation.

(5) The limitation of paragraph (1) shall not apply to any regulation relating to the Franchise Tax Board’s policies, practices, or procedures.

(6) The limitation of paragraph (1) may be superseded by a legislative grant of authority to the Franchise Tax Board to prescribe the effective date with respect to any regulation.

(7) The Franchise Tax Board may provide for any taxpayer to elect to apply any regulation before the dates specified in paragraph (1).

(c) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision are operative with respect to regulations which relate to California statutory provisions enacted on or after January 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19504.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board, for the purpose of administering its duties under this part, including ascertaining the correctness of any return; making a return where none has been made; determining or collecting the liability of any person in respect of any liability imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part (or the liability at law or in
 equity of any transferee in respect of that liability); shall have the power to require by demand, that an entity of any kind including, but not limited to, employers, persons, or financial institutions provide information or make available for examination or copying at a specified time and place, or both, any book, papers, or other data which may be relevant to that purpose. Any demand to a financial institution shall comply with the California Right to Financial Privacy Act set forth in Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 7460) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code. Information that may be required upon demand includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Addresses and telephone numbers of persons designated by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) Information contained on Federal Form W-2 (Wage and Tax Statement), Federal Form W-4 (Employee’s Withholding Allowance
 Certificate), or State Form DE-4 (Employee’s Withholding Allowance Certificate).

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may require the attendance of the taxpayer or of any other person having knowledge in the premises and may take testimony and require material proof for its information and administer oaths to carry out this part.

(c) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may issue subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum, which subpoenas must be signed by any member of the Franchise Tax Board, and may be served on any person for any purpose.

(2) For taxpayers that have been contacted by the Franchise Tax Board regarding the use of an abusive tax avoidance transaction, as defined in Section 19777, the subpoena may be signed by any member of the Franchise Tax Board, the Executive Officer of the Franchise Tax Board, or any
 designee.

(d) Obedience to subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum issued in accordance with this section may be enforced by application to the superior court as set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) When examining a return, the Franchise Tax Board shall not use financial status or economic reality examination techniques to determine the existence of unreported income of any taxpayer unless the Franchise Tax Board has a reasonable indication that there is a likelihood of unreported income. This subdivision applies to any examination beginning on or after October 10, 1999.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to subpoenas issued on or after the effective date of the act adding this
 subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 7.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19504.5.

(a) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no subpoena may be issued under this part and the Franchise Tax Board may not begin any action under Article 2 (commencing with Section 1180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to enforce any subpoena to produce or analyze any tax-related computer software source code.

(2) Any software and related materials that are provided to the Franchise Tax Board under this part
 shall be subject to the safeguards under subdivision (c).

(b) (1) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply to any portion, item, or component of the tax-related computer software source code if all of the following apply:

(A) The Franchise Tax Board is unable to otherwise reasonably ascertain the correctness of any item on a return from either of the following:

(i) The taxpayer’s books, papers, records, or other data.

(ii) The computer software executable code (and any modifications thereof) to which the source code relates and any associated data which, when executed, produces the output to ascertain the correctness of the item.

(B) The Franchise Tax Board
 identifies with reasonable specificity the portion, item, or component of the source code needed to verify the correctness of the item on the return.

(C) The Franchise Tax Board determines that the need for the portion, item, or component of the source code with respect to the item outweighs the risks of unauthorized disclosure of trade secrets.

(2) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following:

(A) Any inquiry into any offense connected with the administration or enforcement of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(B) Any tax-related computer software source code acquired or developed by the taxpayer or related person
 primarily for internal use by the taxpayer or that person rather than for commercial distribution.

(C) Any communications between the owner of the tax-related computer software source code and the taxpayer or related persons.

(D) Any tax-related computer software source code which is required to be provided or made available pursuant to any other provision of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(3) For purposes of paragraph (1), the Franchise Tax Board shall be treated as meeting the requirements of subparagraphs (A) and (B) of that paragraph if all of the following apply:

(A) The Franchise Tax Board determines that it is not feasible to determine the
 correctness of an item without access to the computer software executable code and associated data described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1).

(B) The Franchise Tax Board makes a formal request to the taxpayer for the code and data and to the owner of the computer software source code for the executable code.

(C) The code and data are not provided within 180 days of that request.

(4) In any proceeding brought under Article 2 (commencing with Section 1180) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code to enforce a subpoena issued under the authority of this subdivision, the court shall, at the request of any party, hold a hearing to determine whether the applicable requirements of this section have been met.

(c) (1) In any court proceeding to enforce a subpoena for any portion of software, the court may receive evidence and issue any order necessary to prevent the disclosure of trade secrets or other confidential information with respect to that software, including requiring that any information be placed under seal to be opened only as directed by the court.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, and in addition to any protections ordered pursuant to paragraph (1), in the case of software that comes into the possession or control of the Franchise Tax Board in the course of any examination with respect to any taxpayer, all of the following shall apply:

(A) The software may be used only in connection with the examination of that taxpayer’s return, any protest or appeal by the taxpayer, any judicial proceeding and any appeals
 therefrom, or any inquiry into any offense connected with the administration or enforcement of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(B) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide, in advance, to the taxpayer and the owner of the software a written list of the names of all individuals who will analyze or otherwise have access to the software.

(C) (i) The software shall be maintained in a secure area or place, and in the case of computer software source code, shall not be removed from the owner’s place of business unless the owner permits, or a court orders, that removal.

(ii) For purposes of clause (i), the owner shall make available any necessary equipment or materials for analysis of computer
 software source code required to be conducted on the owner’s premises.

(D) The software may not be copied except as necessary to perform an analysis, and the Franchise Tax Board shall number all copies made and certify in writing that no other copies have been or will be made.

(E) At the end of the period during which the software may be used under subparagraph (A), both of the following apply:

(i) The software and all copies thereof shall be returned to the person from whom they were obtained and any copies thereof made under subparagraph (D) on the hard drive of a machine or other mass storage device shall be permanently deleted.

(ii) The Franchise Tax Board shall obtain from any person who analyzes or otherwise had access to that software a written
 certification under penalty of perjury that all copies and related materials have been returned and that no copies were made of them.

(F) The software may not be decompiled or disassembled.

(G) (i) The Franchise Tax Board shall provide to the taxpayer and the owner of any interest in the software, as the case may be, a written agreement, between the Franchise Tax Board and any person who is not an officer or employee of the State of California and who will analyze or otherwise have access to that software, which provides that the person agrees not to do either of the following:

(I) Disclose the software to any person other than persons to whom the information could be disclosed for tax administration purposes under Section 19542.

(II) Participate for two years in the development of software which is intended for a similar purpose as the software examined.

(ii) The owner of any interest in the software shall be considered a party to any agreement described in clause (i).

(H) The software shall be treated as return information for purposes of Section 19542.

(d) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Software” includes computer software source code and computer software executable code.

(2) “Computer software source code” means all of the following:

(A) The code written by a programmer using a programming language which is comprehensible to
 appropriately trained persons and is not capable of directly being used to give instructions to a computer.

(B) Related programmers’ notes, design documents, memoranda, and similar documentation.

(C) Related customer communications.

(3) “Computer software executable code” means both of the following:
